Louisiana, session 2026, SB394.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 17:4037.6(A), (B), and (C) are hereby amended and reenacted and
R.S. 17:4037.3(12), 4037.13 and 4037.14 are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§4037.3. Definitions
As used in this Chapter, the following terms have the following meanings,
Page 1 of 7
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-72 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 394
unless otherwise clearly indicated:
* * *
(12) "Participating nonpublic school" means a state board approved
nonpublic school that enrolls participating students who receive scholarships
under the program.
* * *
§4037.6. Account funds
A. The department, on a quarterly basis, shall allocate funds, in an amount
determined by the state board, to each student's account from funds appropriated or
otherwise made available for the program.
B.(1) The amount allocated to an account shall be prorated if a student
transfers into the program after the beginning of a school year.
(2)(a) If a participating school or service provider requires partial payment
of tuition or fees prior to the start of the school year to reserve space for a student,
the department may make the partial payment prior to the start of the school year and
deduct the amount from subsequent quarterly account deposits to ensure that
adequate funds remain available throughout the school year.
(b) If a participating student reserves a space or enrolls as a full-time
student at a participating nonpublic school, then the provisions of R.S. 17:
4037.13 and 4037.14 shall apply.
(c) ; however In all circumstances, if the parent decides not to use the school
or service provider, the school or service provider shall return the partial reservation
payment or the full-time tuition payment to the department which shall credit the
amount to the account.
C.(1) The department shall implement a system for parents to direct funds
from accounts to participating schools and service providers for qualified education
expenses by electronic or online funds transfer. The system shall include provisions
related to expedited full-time tuition payment made pursuant to R.S.
17:4037.14.
Page 2 of 7
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-72 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 394
(2) The system shall also allow parents to publicly rate, review, and share
information about participating schools and service providers.
* * *
§4037.13. Voluntary limited waiver of education privacy rights; duties of the
program manager; duties of the participating nonpublic school
A. If the parent is accepted for the student's enrollment in the LA
GATOR Scholarship Program and on the application indicates that the
participating student intends to enroll on a full-time basis in a participating
nonpublic school, the parent may execute a written consent form authorizing
the department to disclose limited student information as provided in this
Section and authorizing the program manager to make expedited, direct tuition
payments to the nonpublic school, pursuant to R.S. 17:4037.14.
B.(1) The written consent shall constitute a voluntary waiver of
applicable education privacy protections and rights under R.S. 17:3914 and the
federal Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act, 20 U.S.C. §1232g et seq.,
and operate solely to the extent necessary for the program manager of the
scholarship program to expedite payments made to the participating nonpublic
school so as not to disrupt student attendance or result in the loss of a reserved
space for the participating student.
(2) The waiver shall be limited in scope and duration as provided in this
Section and shall not constitute a general waiver of all education privacy rights.
C. Upon receipt of a properly executed consent form, the department
may disclose the following student information to the program manager and the
participating nonpublic school in which the student intends to enroll on a full-
time basis:
(1) Student full legal name and student number.
(2) Date of birth.
(3) Grade level.
(4) Parent or guardian's name and contact information necessary to
Page 3 of 7
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-72 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 394
match the parent to the participating students and the chosen participating
nonpublic school.
(5) Enrollment status and scholarship eligibility status.
D. The disclosure of protected information shall be limited strictly to
information necessary to do the following:
(1) Verify student identity and scholarship eligibility.
(2) Facilitate enrollment in a participating nonpublic school.
(3) Administer scholarship funds in a manner so that a participating
nonpublic school and the program manager may identify and connect a
participating student to the parent who is authorized to direct payments from
the scholarship account funds to make full-time tuition payments to the
nonpublic school.
(4) Ensure compliance and accountability provisions that govern the
scholarship program.
E. Any program manager or nonpublic school receiving student
information pursuant to this Section shall:
(1) Use the information solely for purposes of administering the
scholarship program.
(2) Implement reasonable administrative, technical, and physical
safeguards to protect the confidentiality and security of student information.
(3) Be contractually prohibited from redisclosing student information
except as expressly authorized by the department and consistent with R.S.
17:3914.
F. The department shall include data privacy and security requirements
in all contracts with program managers, including provisions for breach
notification, and penalties for unauthorized disclosure.
G.(1) The department shall develop a standardized consent and waiver
form. The form shall comply with this Section and shall clearly and
conspicuously state:
Page 4 of 7
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-72 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 394
(a) The specific information to be disclosed.
(b) The entities authorized to receive the information.
(c) The purpose of the disclosure.
(d) The duration of the consent.
(2) Nothing herein shall interfere with the parents right to revoke
consent in writing at any time prior to the disclosure, subject to administrative
time lines necessary for program operation.
H. Consent provided under this Section shall remain in effect for the
duration of the student's participation in the scholarship program unless
revoked in writing by the parent.
§4037.14. Expedited payments for full-time participating students at
participating nonpublic schools
A. Once the program manager is notified by the department that the
participating student is qualified for the scholarship program, that the parent
has executed a voluntary limited waiver of education privacy rights, pursuant
to R.S. 17:4037.14, and that the participating student intends to enroll in a
particular nonpublic school, then the program manager shall do all of the
following:
(1) Confirm with the participating nonpublic school that the student has
met the enrollment requirements and has been accepted at the school.
(2) Confirm that the student intends to enroll as a full-time student at the
particular participating nonpublic school.
(3) Place a hold on funds in the student's account in an amount equal to
the costs of full-time tuition at the participating nonpublic school, once
enrollment has been confirmed.
(4) Make an expedited electronic or online transfer of the payments to
the participating nonpublic school upon enrollment of the student, with partial
payments to be made in compliance with R.S. 17:4037.6.
B. If the student, for whatever reason, does not enroll or attend the
Page 5 of 7
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-72 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 394
indicated participating nonpublic school, then the school shall immediately
return any payments made pursuant to this Section, including advanced
payment to reserve a seat, in the manner provided by in R.S. 17:4037.6.
Section 2. The Louisiana State Law Institute, pursuant to its statutory authority, is
hereby directed to renumber and rearrange in alphabetic order the definitions in R.S.
17:4037.3.
Section 3. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.